Utah statutes.
63A-2-407.   Transfer of information technology equipment for persons with a disability.

(1)  The division may transfer information technology equipment, or authorize the transfer of technology equipment by an agency, to a nonprofit entity for distribution to and use by a person with a disability.

(2)  Interagency transfers and sales of surplus property to state and local agencies within the 30-day period under Section 63A-2-406 shall have priority over transfers under Subsection (1).

(3)  The division shall annually report to the Division of Services for People With Disabilities the:

(a)  names of the nonprofit entities receiving transfers under Subsection (1); and

(b)  types and amounts of equipment received.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 207, 2011 General Session

